South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S153.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  It is proposed that Section 4, Article XI of the Constitution of this State be repealed, which reads: Section 4. No money shall be paid from public funds nor shall the credit of the State or any of its political subdivisions be used for the direct benefit of any religious or other private educational institution. SECTION 2.  The proposed amendment must be submitted to the qualified electors at the next general election for representatives.  Ballots must be provided at the various voting precincts with the following words printed or written on the ballot: "Must Section 4, Article XI of the Constitution of this State, relating to the use of public funds, be amended so as to repeal the prohibition on public funds being used for the direct benefit of a religious or other private educational institution? Yes     o No      o Those voting in favor of the question shall deposit a ballot with a check or cross mark in the square after the word 'Yes', and those voting against the question shall deposit a ballot with a check or cross mark in the square after the word 'No'." ----XX----